Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201871-474
Comprehensive stroke center, designated thrombectomy-capable stroke center, primary stroke center, or acute stroke-ready hospital; restriction on advertisement.

A person may not advertise to the public, by way of any medium, that a hospital is a comprehensive stroke center, a designated thrombectomy-capable stroke center, a primary stroke center, or an acute stroke-ready hospital unless the hospital is listed as such by the Department of Health and Human Services under the Stroke System of Care Act.

Laws 2016, LB722, § 13;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 57.
July 19, 2018
Stroke System of Care Act, see section 71-4201.